North Dakota, session 69, SB2383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 14-09-00.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
14-09-00.1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Decisionmaking responsibility" means the responsibility to make decisions concerning
the child. The term may refer to decisions on all issues or on specified issues, but not
child support issues.
2. "Equal decisionmaking responsibility" means each parent is responsible for
communicating with the other parent and agreeing on all major decisions that do not
involve routine or day-to-day matters, including choosing a day care service provider,
education, extracurricular activities, health care, and spiritual development.
3. "Equal parenting time" means each parent has the child in the parent's home for fifty
percent of the time or as close to fifty percent of the time as possible based on the
circumstances of the parents and child.
Page No. 1 25.0774.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. "Harm" means negative changes in a child's health which occur when an individual
responsible for the child's welfare:
a. Inflicts, or allows to be inflicted, upon the child, physical or mental injury, including
injuries sustained as a result of excessive corporal punishment; or
b. Commits, allows to be committed, or conspires to commit, against the child, a sex
offense as defined in chapter 12.1-20.
3.5. "Parental rights and responsibilities" means all rights and responsibilities a parent has
concerning the parent's child.
4.6. "Parenting plan" means a written plan describing each parent's rights and
responsibilities.
5.7. "Parenting schedule" means the schedule of when the child is in the care of each
parent.
6.8. "Parenting time" means the time when the child is to be in the care of a parent.
7.9. "Primary residential responsibility" means a parent with more than fifty percent of the
residential responsibility.
8.10. "Residential responsibility" means a parent's responsibility to provide a home for the
child.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 14-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Legitimacy of children and parents.
A child or parent involved in an action brought under this chapter may not be denied the
privileges or immunities of citizens of the United States and this state without due process of
law, and may not be denied equal protection of the law.
SECTION 3. A new section to chapter 14-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Residential responsibility of a child - Presumption of fitness.
1. In any proceeding addressing parental rights and responsibilities, there is a
presumption that each parent is fit to care for a child and make decisions about the
child's care, including making joint decisions with the other parent. The court may not
apply the best interests and welfare of the child factors under section 14 - 09 - 06.2
Page No. 2 25.0774.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
unless a party establishes by clear and convincing evidence that a parent is unfit to
care for a child.
SECTION 4. A new section to chapter 14-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Priority of residential responsibility prohibited.
1. The court may not give priority to a parent, regardless of gender, race, creed, or
religion when determining the residential responsibility of a child.
2. Notwithstanding any other law, if a court gives priority to a parent in violation of this
section, the court's action is deemed to be a violation of a parent's equal protection
rights under the law.
SECTION 5. A new section to chapter 14-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Equal residential responsibility - When awarded .
1. Unless the court determines a parent is unfit to care for a child in accordance with
section 3 of this Act, or subsection 2, 4, 5, or 6 is applicable, making an award of equa l
residential responsibility inappropriate, a court must grant the parents equal residential
responsibility of a child.
2. If the court determines the parents' residences are separated by a distance that would
make an award of equal residential responsibility detrimental to the physical or
emotional health of a child, and neither parent is willing to relocate to be closer to the
other parent, the court must grant the maximum amount of parenting time possible to
the parent who is not awarded primary residential responsibility of the child .
3. If a parent is on active military duty or is inherently unable to execute the full allotted
parenting time awarded, the court must order the missed parenting time be
compensated to the maximum extent possible, including on each extended school
break, if applicable.
4. If the child at issue in the action is an infant at the time of the proceeding and the
schedule, health, or other circumstances of a parent or the child does not allow for a
parenting schedule that provides for exchanges between the parents at least every
seven days, the court shall determine a parenting schedule that is in the best interests
of the child.
Page No. 3 25.0774.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
5. If a parent is unable to provide proper care for a child with a special need, as
documented by a child development expert, and an award of equal residential
responsibility would be detrimental to the physical or emotional health of the child, the
court shall determine a parenting schedule that is in the best interests of the child.
6. If the parties agree through mediation to deviate from equal residential responsibility,
the court must give consideration to the preference of the parties unless the
agreement is determined by the court to be detrimental to the emotional or physical
health of the child.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 14-09-06.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
14-09-06.2. Best interests and welfare of child - Court consideration - Factors.
1. For the purpose of parental rights and responsibilities, the best interests and welfare of
the child is determined by the court's consideration and evaluation of all factors
affecting the best interests and welfare of the child. These factors may not be
considered unless the court determines a parent is unfit to care for a child under
section 3 of this Act or the court determines an award of equal residential responsibility
is inappropriate under section 5 of this Act. These factors include all of the following
when applicable:
a. The love, affection, and other emotional ties existing between the parents and
child and the ability of each parent to provide the child with nurture, love,
affection, and guidance.
b. The ability of each parent to assure that the child receives adequate food,
clothing, shelter, medical care, and a safe environment.
c. The child's developmental needs and the ability of each parent to meet those
needs, both in the present and in the future.
d. The sufficiency and stability of each parent's home environment, the impact of
extended family, the length of time the child has lived in each parent's home, and
the desirability of maintaining continuity in the child's home and community.
e. The willingness and ability of each parent to facilitate and encourage a close and
continuing relationship between the other parent and the child.
f. The moral fitness of the parents, as that fitness impacts the child.
Page No. 4 25.0774.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
g. The mental and physical health of the parents, as that health impacts the child.
h.g. The home, school, and community records of the child and the potential effect of
any change.
i.h. If the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that a child is of sufficient
maturity to make a sound judgment, the court may give substantial weight to the
preference of the mature child. The court also shall give due consideration to
other factors that may have affected the child's preference, including whether the
child's preference was based on undesirable or improper influences.
j.i. Evidence of domestic violence. In determining parental rights and responsibilities,
the court shall consider evidence of domestic violence. If the court finds credible
evidence that domestic violence has occurred, and there exists one incident of
domestic violence which resulted in serious bodily injury or involved the use of a
dangerous weapon or there exists a pattern of domestic violence within a
reasonable time proximate to the proceeding, this combination creates a
rebuttable presumption that a parent who has perpetrated domestic violence may
not be awarded residential responsibility for the child. This presumption may be
overcome only by clear and convincing evidence that the best interests of the
child require that parent have residential responsibility. The court shall cite
specific findings of fact to show that the residential responsibility best protects the
child and the parent or other family or household member who is the victim of
domestic violence. If necessary to protect the welfare of the child, residential
responsibility for a child may be awarded to a suitable third person, provided that
the person would not allow access to a violent parent except as ordered by the
court. If the court awards residential responsibility to a third person, the court
shall give priority to the child's nearest suitable adult relative. The fact that the
abused parent suffers from the effects of the abuse may not be grounds for
denying that parent residential responsibility. As used in this subdivision,
"domestic violence" means domestic violence as defined in section 14-07.1-01. A
court may consider, but is not bound by, a finding of domestic violence in another
proceeding under chapter 14-07.1.
Page No. 5 25.0774.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
k.j. The interaction and inter-relationship, or the potential for interaction and inter-
relationship, of the child with any personindividual who resides in, is present, or
frequents the household of a parent and who may significantly affect the child's
best interests. The court shall consider that person'sindividual's history of self-
harm and inflicting, or tendency to inflict, physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or
the fear of physical harm, bodily injury, or assault, on other personsindividuals.
l.k. The making of false allegations not made in good faith, by one parent against the
other, of harm to a child.
m.l. Any other factors considered by the court to be relevant to a particular parental
rights and responsibilities dispute.
2. In a proceeding for parental rights and responsibilities of a child of a service member,
a court may not consider a parent's past deployment or possible future deployment in
itself in determining the best interests of the child but may consider any significant
impact on the best interests of the child of the parent's past or possible future
deployment.
3. In any proceeding under this chapter, the court, at any stage of the proceedings after
final judgment, may make orders about what security is to be given for the care,
custody, and support of the unmarried minor children of the marriage as from the
circumstances of the parties and the nature of the case is equitable.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 14-09-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
14-09-07. Residence of child.
1. The primary residence of a child or the relocation of a child to another state may not
be determined until the final judgment in an action. An interim order is not a final
judgment.
2. A parent with primary residential responsibility for a child may not change the primary
residence of the child to another state except upon order of the court or with the
written consent of the other parent, if the other parent has been given parenting time
by the decree.
2.3. A parent with equal residential responsibility for a child may not change the residence
of the child to another stateoutside of a fifty mile radius except with the written consent
Page No. 6 25.0774.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
of the other parent or order of the court allowing the move and awarding that parent
primary residential responsibility.
3.4. A court order is not required if the other parent:
a. Has not, as established by clear and convincing evidence, exercised parenting
time for a period of one year; or
b. Has moved to another state and is more than fifty miles [80.47 kilometers] from
the residence of the parent with primary residential responsibility. If the other
parent is an active member of the armed forces, this subdivision does not apply.
SECTION 8. APPLICATION. This Act applies to each action involving a determination of
parental rights and responsibilities in which a child at issue in the action is under the age of
eighteen. The limitations under section 14-09-06.6 on postjudgment modifications of primary
residential responsibility, including the requirement that the moving party establish a prima facie
case, or material change in circumstance, justifying a modification, and under rule 8.2 of the
North Dakota Rules of Court on amending an interim order, do not apply to the first motion filed
in an action on or after the effective date of this Act by a moving party seeking a determination
of parental rights and responsibilities under the presumption and evidentiary burden established
by this Act.
Page No. 7 25.0774.03000